Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.410

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the board may take disciplinary action and may impose any of the sanctions specified in RCW 18.235.110 for the following conduct, acts, or conditions, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020:

(1) Solicitation of human remains by a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder, or agent, assistant, or employee of the licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder whether the solicitation occurs after death or while death is impending. This chapter does not prohibit general advertising or the sale of prearrangement funeral service contracts;

(2) Solicitation may include employment of solicitors, payment of commission, bonus, rebate, or any form of gratuity or payment of a finders fee, referral fee, or other consideration given for the purpose of obtaining or providing the services for human remains or where death is impending;

(3) Acceptance by a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder or other employee of a funeral establishment of a commission, bonus, rebate, or gratuity in consideration of directing business to a cemetery, crematory, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural organic reduction facility, mausoleum, columbarium, florist, or other person providing goods and services to the disposition of human remains;

(4) Using a casket or part of a casket that has previously been used as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the burial or other disposition of human remains without the written consent of the person lawfully entitled to control the disposition of remains of the deceased person in accordance with RCW 68.50.160. This subsection does not prohibit the use of rental caskets, such as caskets of which the outer shell portion is rented and the inner insert that contains the human remains is purchased and used for the disposition, that are disclosed as such in the statement of funeral goods and services;

(5) Violation of a state law, municipal law, or county ordinance or regulation affecting the handling, custody, care, transportation, or disposition of human remains, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020;

(6) Refusing to promptly surrender the custody of human remains upon the expressed order of the person lawfully entitled to its custody under RCW 68.50.160;

(7) Selling, or offering for sale, a share, certificate, or an interest in the business of a funeral establishment, or in a corporation, firm, or association owning or operating a funeral establishment that promises or purports to give to purchasers a right to the services of a licensee, registrant, endorsement, or permit holder at a charge or cost less than offered or given to the public;

(8) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative ruling relating to funeral practice, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020;

(9) Knowingly concealing information concerning a violation of this title.

[ 2019 c 432 s 39; 2016 c 81 s 9; 2005 c 365 s 24; 2002 c 86 s 221; 1994 c 17 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 432: See note following RCW 68.05.175.

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.